Arkansas, session 2025, SB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-1-703(b)(2), concerning members of the
board of directors of the Arkansas Financial Education Commission, is amended
to read as follows:
(2)(A) The board shall consist of nine (9) members.
(B) Members of the board shall consist of:
(i) The Treasurer of State or his or her designee,
who shall serve as chair;
(ii) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary
Education or his or her designee;
(iii) The Securities Commissioner or his or her
designee;
(iv) The Bank Commissioner or his or her designee;
(v)(iv) One (1) member who is designated by the
Arkansas Bankers Association;
(vi)(v) One (1) member who is a member of a
federally chartered credit union doing business in this state, appointed by
the Treasurer of State; and
BBB
*ANS322*
03-18-2025 14:59:46 ANS322

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB373
(vii)(vi) Three (3) members who have various
financial backgrounds, one (1) member of the three (3) to be a female, one
(1) member of the three (3) to be a racial minority, appointed by the
Treasurer of State; and
(vii) One (1) member who is designated by the
Secretary of State.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-1-703(c)(4)(A), concerning the meetings
of the board of directors of the Arkansas Financial Education Commission, is
amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) The board shall meet at least two (2) times a year, one
(1) meeting to be held in the spring and one (1) meeting to be held in the
fall, at the call of the chair.

/s/Irvin





















03-18-2025 14:59:46 ANS322